Illinois, session 104th, SB4104.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The following named sums, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and purposes 7hereinafter named, are appropriated to meet the ordinary and 8contingent expenses of the Department of Labor:9OPERATIONS10ALL DIVISIONS11Payable from General Revenue Fund: 12  For Personal Services ...........................10,200,00013  For State Contributions to14   Social Security ...................................773,30015  For Contractual Services ...........................445,00016  For Travel ..........................................40,00017  For Commodities .....................................25,00018  For Printing ........................................10,00019  For Equipment........................................25,00020  For Electronic Data Processing .....................770,00021  For Telecommunication Services......................100,00022  For Operation of Auto Equipment......................45,00023    Total                                         $12,433,300   SB4104- 2 -OMB104 00195 NLG 10195 b1    Section 10. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, is appropriated from the Amusement Ride and 3Patron Safety Fund to the Department of Labor for operational 4expenses associated with the administration of The Amusement 5Ride and Attraction Safety Act. 6    Section 15. The amount of $4,000,000, or so much thereof 7as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Child Labor and 8Day and Temporary Labor Services Enforcement Fund to the 9Department of Labor for operational expenses associated with 10the administration of The Child Labor Law Act and the Day and 11Temporary Labor Services Act. 12    Section 20. The amount of $150,000, or so much thereof as 13may be necessary, is appropriated from the Employee 14Classification Fund to the Department of Labor for operational 15expenses associated with the administration of The Employee 16Classification Act. 17    Section 25. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the Wage Theft 19Enforcement Fund to the Department of Labor for operational 20expenses associated with the administration of The Illinois 21Wage Payment and Collection Act.   SB4104- 3 -OMB104 00195 NLG 10195 b1    Section 30. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 2as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Department of 3Labor Federal Trust Fund to the Department of Labor for all 4costs associated with promoting and enforcing the occupational 5safety and health administration state program for public 6sector worksites. 7    Section 35. The amount of $4,000,000, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Federal 9Industrial Services Fund to the Department of Labor for 10administrative and other expenses and for the Occupational 11Safety and Health Administration Program, including refunds 12and prior years' costs. 13    Section 40. The amount of $400,000, or so much thereof as 14may be necessary, is appropriated from the Department of Labor 15Federal Indirect Cost Fund to the Department of Labor for all 16costs associated with OSHA Indirect Costs. 17    Section 45. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 18may be necessary, is appropriated from the Equal Pay Fund to 19the Department of Labor for all costs associated with the 20administration of the Equal Pay Act of 2003. 21    Section 50. The sum of $681,500, or so much thereof as may 22be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to   SB4104- 4 -OMB104 00195 NLG 10195 b1the Department of Labor for all costs associated with the 2administration of the Equal Pay Act of 2003. 3    Section 55. The sum of $895,700, or so much thereof as may 4be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 5the Department of Labor for costs associated with the 6administration of the Nurse Agency Licensing Act. 7    Section 60. The sum of $812,300, or so much thereof as may 8be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 9the Department of Labor for costs associated with the 10administration of the Paid Leave for All Workers Act. 11    Section 65. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 12be necessary, is appropriated from the Paid Leave for All 13Workers Fund to the Department of Labor for costs associated 14with the enforcement of the Paid Leave for All Workers Act. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 162026.